engine/dictionaries/is/is.aff
FLAG num
# Fallbeyging kvk vb 01a ö
SFX 277 N 99
SFX 277 0 n .	1
SFX 277 aga ögur .	2
SFX 277 anga öngur .	2
SFX 277 aska öskur .	2
SFX 277 ala ölur .	2
SFX 277 ata ötur .	2
SFX 277 aka ökur .	2
SFX 277 anta öntur .	2
SFX 277 afa öfur .	2
SFX 277 aga ögurnar .	3
SFX 277 anga öngurnar .	3
SFX 277 aska öskurnar .	3
SFX 277 ala ölurnar .	3
SFX 277 ata öturnar .	3
SFX 277 aka ökurnar .	3
SFX 277 anta önturnar .	3
SFX 277 afa öfurnar .	3
SFX 277 aga ögu .	4
SFX 277 anga öngu .	4
SFX 277 aska ösku .	4
SFX 277 ala ölu .	4
SFX 277 ata ötu .	4
SFX 277 aka öku .	4
SFX 277 anta öntu .	4
SFX 277 afa öfu .	4
SFX 277 aga öguna .	5
SFX 277 anga önguna .	5
SFX 277 aska öskuna .	5
SFX 277 ala öluna .	5
SFX 277 ata ötuna .	5
SFX 277 aka ökuna .	5
SFX 277 anta öntuna .	5
SFX 277 afa öfuna .	5
SFX 277 aga ögur .	6
SFX 277 anga öngur .	6
SFX 277 aska öskur .	6
SFX 277 ala ölur .	6
SFX 277 ata ötur .	6
SFX 277 aka ökur .	6
SFX 277 anta öntur .	6
SFX 277 afa öfur .	6
SFX 277 aga ögurnar .	7
SFX 277 anga öngurnar .	7
SFX 277 aska öskurnar .	7
SFX 277 ala ölurnar .	7
SFX 277 ata öturnar .	7
SFX 277 aka ökurnar .	7
SFX 277 anta önturnar .	7
SFX 277 afa öfurnar .	7
SFX 277 aga ögu .	8
SFX 277 anga öngu .	8
SFX 277 aska ösku .	8
SFX 277 ala ölu .	8
SFX 277 ata ötu .	8
SFX 277 aka öku .	8
SFX 277 anta öntu .	8
SFX 277 afa öfu .	8
SFX 277 aga ögunni .	9
SFX 277 anga öngunni .	9
SFX 277 aska öskunni .	9
SFX 277 ala ölunni .	9
SFX 277 ata ötunni .	9
SFX 277 aka ökunni .	9
SFX 277 anta öntunni .	9
SFX 277 afa öfunni .	9
SFX 277 aga ögum .	10
SFX 277 anga öngum .	10
SFX 277 aska öskum .	10
SFX 277 ala ölum .	10
SFX 277 ata ötum .	10
SFX 277 aka ökum .	10
SFX 277 anta öntum .	10
SFX 277 afa öfum .	10
SFX 277 aga ögunum .	11
SFX 277 anga öngunum .	11
SFX 277 aska öskunum .	11
SFX 277 ala ölunum .	11
SFX 277 ata ötunum .	11
SFX 277 aka ökunum .	11
SFX 277 anta öntunum .	11
SFX 277 afa öfunum .	11
SFX 277 aga ögu .	12
SFX 277 anga öngu .	12
SFX 277 aska ösku .	12
SFX 277 ala ölu .	12
SFX 277 ata ötu .	12
SFX 277 aka öku .	12
SFX 277 anta öntu .	12
SFX 277 afa öfu .	12
SFX 277 aga ögunnar .	13
SFX 277 anga öngunnar .	13
SFX 277 aska öskunnar .	13
SFX 277 ala ölunnar .	13
SFX 277 ata ötunnar .	13
SFX 277 aka ökunnar .	13
SFX 277 anta öntunnar .	13
SFX 277 afa öfunnar .	13
SFX 277 a na .	14
SFX 277 a nanna .	15

# Fallbeyging kvk vb kona
SFX 278 N 15
SFX 278 0 n .	1
SFX 278 a ur .	2
SFX 278 a urnar .	3
SFX 278 a u .	4
SFX 278 a una .	5
SFX 278 a ur .	6
SFX 278 a urnar .	7
SFX 278 a u .	8
SFX 278 a unni .	9
SFX 278 a um .	10
SFX 278 a unum .	11
SFX 278 a u .	12
SFX 278 a unnar .	13
SFX 278 ona venna .	14
SFX 278 ona vennanna .	15

# Fallbeyging kvk vb örnefni
SFX 279 N 3
SFX 279 a u .	4
SFX 279 a u .	8
SFX 279 a u .	12

# Fallbeyging kvk vb örnefni ö
SFX 280 N 3
SFX 280 alta öltu .	4
SFX 280 alta öltu .	8
SFX 280 alta öltu .	12

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01
SFX 281 N 256
SFX 281 lur l .	19
SFX 281 kur k .	19
SFX 281 tur t .	19
SFX 281 gur g .	19
SFX 281 fur f .	19
SFX 281 nur n .	19
SFX 281 mur m .	19
SFX 281 s s .	19
SFX 281 ur t .	20
SFX 281 0 t s	20
SFX 281 ur ir .	21
SFX 281 0 ir s	21
SFX 281 ur ar .	22
SFX 281 0 ar s	22
SFX 281 lur l .	23
SFX 281 kur k .	23
SFX 281 tur t .	23
SFX 281 gur g .	23
SFX 281 fur f .	23
SFX 281 nur n .	23
SFX 281 mur m .	23
SFX 281 s s .	23
SFX 281 ur an .	24
SFX 281 0 an s	24
SFX 281 ur a .	25
SFX 281 0 a s	25
SFX 281 ur t .	26
SFX 281 0 t s	26
SFX 281 ur a .	27
SFX 281 0 a s	27
SFX 281 ur ar .	28
SFX 281 0 ar s	28
SFX 281 lur l .	29
SFX 281 kur k .	29
SFX 281 tur t .	29
SFX 281 gur g .	29
SFX 281 fur f .	29
SFX 281 nur n .	29
SFX 281 mur m .	29
SFX 281 s s .	29
SFX 281 r m .	30
SFX 281 0 um s	30
SFX 281 ur ri .	31
SFX 281 0 ri s	31
SFX 281 ur u .	32
SFX 281 0 u s	32
SFX 281 r m .	33
SFX 281 0 um s	33
SFX 281 r m .	34
SFX 281 0 um s	34
SFX 281 r m .	35
SFX 281 0 um s	35
SFX 281 ur s .	36
SFX 281 0 s s	36
SFX 281 ur rar .	37
SFX 281 0 rar s	37
SFX 281 ur s .	38
SFX 281 0 s s	38
SFX 281 ur ra .	39
SFX 281 0 ra s	39
SFX 281 ur ra .	40
SFX 281 0 ra s	40
SFX 281 ur ra .	41
SFX 281 0 ra s	41
SFX 281 ur i .	42
SFX 281 0 i s	42
SFX 281 ur a .	43
SFX 281 0 a s	43
SFX 281 ur a .	44
SFX 281 0 a s	44
SFX 281 ur u .	45
SFX 281 0 u s	45
SFX 281 ur u .	46
SFX 281 0 u s	46
SFX 281 ur u .	47
SFX 281 0 u s	47
SFX 281 ur a .	48
SFX 281 0 a s	48
SFX 281 ur u .	49
SFX 281 0 u s	49
SFX 281 ur a .	50
SFX 281 0 a s	50
SFX 281 ur u .	51
SFX 281 0 u s	51
SFX 281 ur u .	52
SFX 281 0 u s	52
SFX 281 ur u .	53
SFX 281 0 u s	53
SFX 281 ur a .	54
SFX 281 0 a s	54
SFX 281 ur u .	55
SFX 281 0 u s	55
SFX 281 ur a .	56
SFX 281 0 a s	56
SFX 281 ur u .	57
SFX 281 0 u s	57
SFX 281 ur u .	58
SFX 281 0 u s	58
SFX 281 ur u .	59
SFX 281 0 u s	59
SFX 281 ur a .	60
SFX 281 0 a s	60
SFX 281 ur u .	61
SFX 281 0 u s	61
SFX 281 ur a .	62
SFX 281 0 a s	62
SFX 281 ur u .	63
SFX 281 0 u s	63
SFX 281 ur u .	64
SFX 281 0 u s	64
SFX 281 ur u .	65
SFX 281 0 u s	65
SFX 281 ur ari .	66
SFX 281 0 ari s	66
SFX 281 ur ari .	67
SFX 281 0 ari s	67
SFX 281 ur ara .	68
SFX 281 0 ara s	68
SFX 281 ur ari .	69
SFX 281 0 ari s	69
SFX 281 ur ari .	70
SFX 281 0 ari s	70
SFX 281 ur ari .	71
SFX 281 0 ari s	71
SFX 281 ur ari .	72
SFX 281 0 ari s	72
SFX 281 ur ari .	73
SFX 281 0 ari s	73
SFX 281 ur ara .	74
SFX 281 0 ara s	74
SFX 281 ur ari .	75
SFX 281 0 ari s	75
SFX 281 ur ari .	76
SFX 281 0 ari s	76
SFX 281 ur ari .	77
SFX 281 0 ari s	77
SFX 281 ur ari .	78
SFX 281 0 ari s	78
SFX 281 ur ari .	79
SFX 281 0 ari s	79
SFX 281 ur ara .	80
SFX 281 0 ara s	80
SFX 281 ur ari .	81
SFX 281 0 ari s	81
SFX 281 ur ari .	82
SFX 281 0 ari s	82
SFX 281 ur ari .	83
SFX 281 0 ari s	83
SFX 281 ur ari .	84
SFX 281 0 ari s	84
SFX 281 ur ari .	85
SFX 281 0 ari s	85
SFX 281 ur ara .	86
SFX 281 0 ara s	86
SFX 281 ur ari .	87
SFX 281 0 ari s	87
SFX 281 ur ari .	88
SFX 281 0 ari s	88
SFX 281 ur ari .	89
SFX 281 0 ari s	89
SFX 281 ur astur .	90
SFX 281 0 astur s	90
SFX 281 r st .	91
SFX 281 0 ust s	91
SFX 281 ur ast .	92
SFX 281 0 ast s	92
SFX 281 ur astir .	93
SFX 281 0 astir s	93
SFX 281 ur astar .	94
SFX 281 0 astar s	94
SFX 281 r st .	95
SFX 281 0 ust s	95
SFX 281 ur astan .	96
SFX 281 0 astan s	96
SFX 281 ur asta .	97
SFX 281 0 asta s	97
SFX 281 ur ast .	98
SFX 281 0 ast s	98
SFX 281 ur asta .	99
SFX 281 0 asta s	99
SFX 281 ur astar .	100
SFX 281 0 astar s	100
SFX 281 r st .	101
SFX 281 0 ust s	101
SFX 281 r stum .	102
SFX 281 0 ustum s	102
SFX 281 ur astri .	103
SFX 281 0 astri s	103
SFX 281 r stu .	104
SFX 281 0 ustu s	104
SFX 281 r stum .	105
SFX 281 0 ustum s	105
SFX 281 r stum .	106
SFX 281 0 ustum s	106
SFX 281 r stum .	107
SFX 281 0 ustum s	107
SFX 281 ur asts .	108
SFX 281 0 asts s	108
SFX 281 ur astrar .	109
SFX 281 0 astrar s	109
SFX 281 ur asts .	110
SFX 281 0 asts s	110
SFX 281 ur astra .	111
SFX 281 0 astra s	111
SFX 281 ur astra .	112
SFX 281 0 astra s	112
SFX 281 ur astra .	113
SFX 281 0 astra s	113
SFX 281 ur asti .	114
SFX 281 0 asti s	114
SFX 281 ur asta .	115
SFX 281 0 asta s	115
SFX 281 ur asta .	116
SFX 281 0 asta s	116
SFX 281 r stu .	117
SFX 281 0 ustu s	117
SFX 281 r stu .	118
SFX 281 0 ustu s	118
SFX 281 r stu .	119
SFX 281 0 ustu s	119
SFX 281 ur asta .	120
SFX 281 0 asta s	120
SFX 281 r stu .	121
SFX 281 0 ustu s	121
SFX 281 ur asta .	122
SFX 281 0 asta s	122
SFX 281 r stu .	123
SFX 281 0 ustu s	123
SFX 281 r stu .	124
SFX 281 0 ustu s	124
SFX 281 r stu .	125
SFX 281 0 ustu s	125
SFX 281 ur asta .	126
SFX 281 0 asta s	126
SFX 281 r stu .	127
SFX 281 0 ustu s	127
SFX 281 ur asta .	128
SFX 281 0 asta s	128
SFX 281 r stu .	129
SFX 281 0 ustu s	129
SFX 281 r stu .	130
SFX 281 0 ustu s	130
SFX 281 r stu .	131
SFX 281 0 ustu s	131
SFX 281 ur asta .	132
SFX 281 0 asta s	132
SFX 281 r stu .	133
SFX 281 0 ustu s	133
SFX 281 ur asta .	134
SFX 281 0 asta s	134
SFX 281 r stu .	135
SFX 281 0 ustu s	135
SFX 281 r stu .	136
SFX 281 0 ustu s	136
SFX 281 r stu .	137
SFX 281 0 ustu s	137

# Lýsingarorðsbeyging 01 -a
